Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 30 Unclaimed Funds of Insurance Company [Repealed]

§§ 26-30-101 through 26-30-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 3.

Cross references. —

For Uniform Unclaimed Property Act, see chapter 24 of title 34.

Editor's notes. —

These sections derived from Laws 1969, ch. 9, §§ 1 through 4.